California, session 20252026, AB1734.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Count Hunger Act.SEC. 2.Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 28050) is added to Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:26.California Health Interview Survey28050.For purposes of this chapter, “California Health Interview Survey” or “CHIS” means the statewide health survey administered by the University of California at Los Angeles (UCLA) in collaboration with state departments and other agencies, and conducted annually through interviews with thousands of households in the state. The survey addresses various health matters, including, but not limited to, use of and access to health care, health conditions and behaviors, and a range of topics that influence health, such as public program participation, housing, income and employment, climate change, food, gun violence, and adverse childhood experiences.28051.(a)The State Department of Public Health shall establish a two-year pilot program, in collaboration with UCLA, to ensure that the sets of questions linked to food insecurity, as those sets were implemented in the California Health Interview Survey for the 2025 calendar year, are funded and covered within the CHIS for purposes of the two years of the pilot program as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).(b)Within the sample of households surveyed for CHIS purposes, the CHIS portion relating to food insecurity, as described in subdivision (a), shall apply to all households whose income is at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty level.(c)(1)UCLA, in collaboration with the department and upon receipt of funding pursuant to subdivision (d), shall publish any available statewide-, regional-, and county-level data, as feasible, that are linked to the food insecurity portion described in subdivision (a). UCLA shall post those data on the AskCHIS reporting tool of the CHIS internet website in a manner accessible to the public.(2)Data published or posted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall exclude any personally identifiable information.(d)(1)(A)This section shall be implemented upon an appropriation made by the Legislature for this purpose.(B)It is the intent of the Legislature that an appropriation pursuant to subparagraph (A) consist of moneys from grants or other contributions from local, private, or philanthropic sources for the purposes expressed in this chapter.(2)This section shall not be applicable to UCLA unless the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make this section applicable.(3)The two-year pilot program described in this section shall be implemented for the 2027 and 2028 calendar years, or two subsequent calendar years, whichever is earlier based on when the appropriation described in paragraph (1) is made available.SEC. 2. Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 28050) is added to Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 26. California Health Interview Survey28050. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that food insecurity is an urgent, nutrition-related health crisis for Californians that experience it.(b) The Legislature further funds and declares that the statewide health survey administered by the University of California, Los Angeles, known as the “California Health Interview Survey” or “CHIS,” is a critical measure of food insecurity in California.28051. (a) The Legislature encourages the University of California, Los Angeles, in administering the California Health Interview Survey, to expand the portion of the survey relating to food insecurity to include households with incomes at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty level.(b) The Legislature further encourages the University of California, Los Angeles, to make available, to the extent feasible and in a manner that does not include personally identifiable information, statewide, regional, and county-level data regarding food insecurity among households with incomes at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty level through the AskCHIS reporting tool or a successor public reporting platform.(c) The Legislature encourages the activities described in this section to be undertaken only to the extent that the University of California, Los Angeles, determines that sufficient resources are available. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the appropriation of state funds or create an entitlement to state funding.